Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.140

Embezzlement—Penalty.

If any person holding the office of state treasurer fails to account for and pay over all moneys in his or her hands in accordance with law, or unlawfully converts to his or her own use in any way whatever, or uses by way of investment in any kind of property, or loans without authority of law, any portion of the public money intrusted to him or her for safekeeping, transfer, or disbursement, or unlawfully converts to his or her own use any money that comes into his or her hands by virtue of his or her office, the person is guilty of a class B felony, and upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned in a state correctional facility not exceeding fourteen years, and fined a sum equal to the amount embezzled.

[ 2003 c 53 s 224; 1992 c 7 s 40; 1965 c 8 s 43.08.140. Prior: 1890 p 644 s 10; RRS s 11027; prior: 1886 p 105 s 11.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Misappropriation of funds: RCW 42.20.070, 42.20.090.